Hawaii statutes.
§846F-3 Internet crimes against children
fee. (a) The court shall order every defendant to pay an internet
crimes against children fee of up to $100 for each felony or misdemeanor
conviction; provided that no fee shall be ordered when the court determines
that the defendant is unable to pay the fee.

(b) When a defendant is also ordered to pay a
fine, make restitution, pay a crime victim compensation fee, or pay other fees
in addition to the internet crimes against children fee, payments by the
defendant shall be made in the order of priority established under section 706-651.

(c) The defendant shall pay the internet
crimes against children fee to the clerk of the court. The fee shall be
deposited with the director of finance who shall transmit the fee to the
internet crimes against children special fund pursuant to section 846F-4. [L
2014, c 115, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 231, §67]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next